Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1135
Reference in vacation; written consent required.

A judge in vacation, upon the written consent of the parties, may make any order of reference which the court, of which he is a member, could make in term time. In such case, the order of reference shall be made on the written agreement of the parties to refer, and shall be filed with the clerk of the court with the other papers in the case.

R.S.1867, Code § 304, p. 445;

R.S.1913, § 7873;

C.S.1922, § 8818;

C.S.1929, § 20-1135;

R.S.1943, § 25-1135.